North Carolina, session 2025, HB753.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. ALLOW FOR THE CONTINUATION OF RETIREMENT BENEFITS FOR
CERTAIN LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICERS

IN SERVICE RETIREMENT ALLOWANCE DISTRIBUTIONS FOR CERTAIN LAW
ENFORCEMENT OFFICERS
SECTION 1.1.(a) Article 1 of Chapter 135 of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 135-5.8. In service distributions; certain State law enforcement officers.
(a) Notwithstanding any provisions of this Article to contrary, both of the following shall
apply to a member who is an employed or retired law enforcement officer:
(1) If the member is in service as a law enforcement officer who has reached 59.5
years of age, the member may elect to receive any retirement allowance for
which the member is otherwise eligible if the member has not separated from
service as a law enforcement officer with the employer under which the
member will begin receiving the retirement allowance.
(2) If the member is a retired law enforcement officer, after a bona fide separation
from service of not less than six months, the member may return to service as
a law enforcement officer and continue to receive that retirement allowance.
(b) If a member in service elects to begin receiving a retirement allowance under
subdivision (a)(1) of this section, then the member is required, at the time of the election to begin
receiving the allowance, to make any elections and creditable service purchases that a member
would be required to make at, or prior to, retirement. This includes the election to begin making
contributions to the retiree death benefit under G.S. 135-5 and the election to transfer Supplement
Retirement Income Plan benefits under G.S. 143-166.30(d).
(c) A member receiving a retirement allowance in accordance with this section shall not
accrue any additional membership service for any employment while the member is receiving
the retirement allowance.
(d) Notwithstanding any requirement in this Article that a member make employee
contributions, once a member elects to begin receiving a retirement allowance under subdivision
*H753-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(a)(1) of this section or return to service under subdivision (a)(2) of this section, and while
receiving a retirement allowance, the member will stop making, or for a return to service will not
begin to make, employee contributions to the Retirement System and the employer will be
required to make payments to the Retirement System in an amount equal to (i) the employer
contributions required under this Chapter and (ii) the employee contributions the member would
have otherwise been required under this Article to make to the Annuity Savings Fund. The gross
salary or wage paid to a member who is receiving a retirement allowance under this section shall
be reduced as if the member was making the employee contribution otherwise required under
this Article.
(e) A member receiving a retirement allowance under this section is not eligible to
participate in the Disability Income Plan of North Carolina under Article 6 of Chapter 135 of the
General Statutes. If the member becomes mentally or physically incapacitated and unable to
further perform duties of the member's employment while receiving a retirement allowance under
this section, then that member will continue to receive the retirement allowance that they had
elected to receive under this section.
(f) A member receiving a retirement allowance under this section is not eligible for State
contributions to the Supplemental Retirement Income Plan under G.S. 143-166.30(e). All State
contributions to the member's Supplemental Retirement Income Plan shall cease upon the
member's election to receive a retirement allowance under this section.
(g) A member receiving a retirement allowance under this section is eligible for benefits
under Article 12A of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes provided that the member meets the
conditions for eligibility required under the Public Safety Employees' Death Benefits Act.
(h) If a member receiving a retirement allowance under this section dies without having
otherwise separated from service from the employer, then the member will be treated as retired
for the purpose of a death benefit under G.S. 135-5 and the member's designated beneficiaries
will receive the benefit as though the member had been retired at the time of death.
(i) If a member receiving a retirement allowance under this section separates from
service with the employer for reasons other than death, then that member will be treated as retired
under the Retirement System for all purposes on the date of separation. If the member returns to
work with an employer after this separation from service, then the member shall do so under the
provisions of subdivision (a)(2) of this section or all provisions of G.S. 135-3 shall apply.
(j) Any changes to the retirement allowances of beneficiaries under this Article shall
apply with equal force and effect to retirement allowances of members under this section, unless
otherwise specified by law.
(k) An election to receive a retirement allowance under subdivision (a)(1) of this section
may be revoked by the member only if the member has not yet separated from service from the
employer under which the member had begun receiving the retirement allowance. Upon
revocation, all of the following shall apply:
(1) G.S. 135-3(a)(8)d.
(2) The employer is no longer responsible for making contributions in the amount
required under subsection (d) of this section. The employer remains
responsible for making the employer contributions required under this Article.
(3) The member is entitled to make any elections a beneficiary would be entitled
to make when being restored to service as an employee.
(4) Any special separation allowance paid to the member under G.S. 143-166.41
shall cease."
SECTION 1.1.(b) G.S. 128-21 reads as rewritten:
"§ 128-21. Definitions.
The following words and phrases as used in this Article, unless Unless a different meaning is
plainly required by the context, shall have the following meanings:all of the following definitions
apply in this Article:
Page 2 House Bill 753-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
…
(11d) "Justice Officer" is as defined under G.S. 17E-2.
(11e) "Law Enforcement Officer" means a full-time paid employee of an employer,
who possesses the power of arrest, who has taken the law enforcement oath
administered under the authority of the State as prescribed by G.S. 11-11, and
who is certified as a law enforcement officer under the provisions of Article 1
of Chapter 17C of the General Statutes or certified as a deputy sheriff under
the provisions of Chapter 17E of the General Statutes. "Law enforcement
officer" also means the sheriff of the county. The number of paid personnel
employed as law enforcement officers by a law enforcement agency may not
exceed the number of law enforcement positions approved by the applicable
local governing board.
…."
SECTION 1.1.(c) Article 3 of Chapter 128 of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 128-27.1. In service distributions; certain local law enforcement and justice officers.
(a) Notwithstanding any provisions of this Article to contrary, both of the following shall
apply to a member who is either an employed or retired law enforcement or justice officer:
(1) If the member is in service as a law enforcement or justice officer who has
reached 59.5 years of age, the member may elect to receive any retirement
allowance for which the member is otherwise eligible if the member has not
separated from service as a law enforcement or justice officer with the
employer under which the member will begin receiving the retirement
allowance.
(2) If the member is a retired law enforcement or justice officer, after a bona fide
separation from service of not less than one month, the member may return to
service as a law enforcement or justice officer and continue to receive that
retirement allowance.
(b) If a member in service elects to begin receiving a retirement allowance under
subdivision (a)(1) of this section, then the member is required, at the time of the election to begin
receiving the allowance, to make any elections and creditable service purchases that a member
would be required to make at, or prior to, retirement. This includes the election to begin making
contributions to the death benefit for retired members under G.S. 128-27 and the election to
transfer Supplement Retirement Income Plan benefits under G.S. 143-166.50(e).
(c) A member receiving a retirement allowance in accordance with this section shall not
accrue any additional membership service for any employment while the member is receiving
the retirement allowance.
(d) Notwithstanding any requirement in this Article requiring a member to make
employee contributions, once a member elects to begin receiving a retirement allowance under
subdivision (a)(1) of this section or return to service under subdivision (a)(2) of this section, and
while receiving a retirement allowance, the member will stop making, or for a return to service
will not begin to make, employee contributions to the Retirement System and the employer will
be required to make payments to the Retirement System in an amount equal to the total of (i) the
employer contributions required under this Article and (ii) the employee contributions the
member would have otherwise been required under this Article to make to the Annuity Savings
Fund. The gross salary or wage paid to a member who is receiving a retirement allowance under
this section shall be reduced as if the member was making the employee contribution otherwise
required under this Article.
(e) A member receiving a retirement allowance under this section is not eligible for
disability benefits under G.S. 128-27. If the member becomes mentally or physically
incapacitated and unable to further perform duties of the member's employment while receiving
House Bill 753-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
a retirement allowance under this section, then that member will continue to receive the
retirement allowance that they had elected to receive under this section.
(f) A member receiving a retirement allowance under this section is not eligible for
employer contributions to the Supplemental Retirement Income Plan under G.S. 143-166.50(e).
All employer contributions to the member's Supplemental Retirement Income Plan shall cease
upon the member's election to receive a retirement allowance under this section.
(g) A member receiving a retirement allowance under this section is eligible for benefits
under Article 12A of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes provided that the member meets the
conditions for eligibility required under the Public Safety Employees' Death Benefits Act.
(h) If a member receiving a retirement allowance under this section dies without having
otherwise separated from service from the employer, then the member will be treated as retired
for the purpose of a death benefit under this Retirement System and the member's designated
beneficiaries will receive the death benefit under G.S. 128-27 as though the member had been
retired at the time of death.
(i) If a member receiving a retirement allowance under this section separates from
service with the employer under which the member had begun receiving the retirement allowance
for reasons other than death, then that member will be treated as retired under the Retirement
System for all purposes on the date of separation. If the member returns to work with an employer
after this separation from service, then the member shall do so under the provisions of subdivision
(a)(2) of this section or all provisions of G.S. 128-24 shall apply.
(j) Any changes to the retirement allowances of beneficiaries under this Article shall
apply with equal force and effect to retirement allowances of members under this section, unless
otherwise specified by law.
(k) An election to receive a retirement allowance under subdivision (a)(1) of this section
may be revoked by the member only if the member has not yet separated from service from the
employer under which the member had begun receiving the retirement allowance. Upon
revocation, all of the following shall apply:
(1) G.S. 128-24(5)d.
(2) The employer is no longer responsible for making contributions in the amount
required under subsection (d) of this section. The employer remains
responsible for making the employer contributions required under this Article.
(3) The member is entitled to make any elections a beneficiary would be entitled
to make when being restored to service as an employee.
(4) Any special separation allowance paid to the member under G.S. 143-166.42
shall cease."
SECTION 1.2.(a) G.S. 135-3 reads as rewritten:
"§ 135-3. Membership.
(a) The membership of this Retirement System shall be is composed as follows:
…
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of sub-subdivsions c. and d. any provision of
subdivision (8) (a)(8) of this section to the contrary, a beneficiary who was a beneficiary retired
on an early or service retirement with the Law Enforcement Officers' Retirement System at the
time of the transfer of law enforcement officers employed by the State and beneficiaries last
employed by the State to this Retirement System on January 1, 1985, and who also was a
contributing member of this Retirement System on January 1, 1985, shall continue to be paid his
or her retirement allowance without restriction and may continue as a member of this Retirement
System with all the rights and privileges appendant to membership.
(b1) Notwithstanding any provision of subdivision (a)(8) of this section to the contrary, a
beneficiary who retired on an early or service retirement as a law enforcement officer may, upon
a return to service, continue to be paid the retirement allowance without restriction if the
beneficiary is eligible for distributions while in service under G.S. 135-5.8(a)(2).
Page 4 House Bill 753-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
…
(f) In order to satisfy the Internal Revenue Service requirements that a retirement is a
bona fide separation from service and to the protect the actuarial integrity of the Retirement
System, a bona fide separation is deemed to occur when a member has severed the employment
relationship with the employer and the Board of Trustees has received all applicable termination
notifications. In order to maintain this presumption of a bona fide separation, no later than 60
days from the date a beneficiary is reemployed with an employer, the employer and the
beneficiary shall file original sworn affidavits with the Board of Trustees attesting to the
following, as applicable:
(1) Prior to the beneficiary's retirement, the employer and the beneficiary did not
have an explicit understanding that the beneficiary would be subsequently
employed by the employer.
(2) The employer and the beneficiary did not reasonably anticipate that,
subsequent to the beneficiary's retirement, the beneficiary would perform for
that employer more than twenty percent (20%) of the average level of bona
fide services performed by the beneficiary for that employer during the
36-month period immediately preceding the beneficiary's retirement."
SECTION 1.2.(b) G.S. 128-24 reads as rewritten:
"§ 128-24. Membership.
(a) The membership of this Retirement System shall be is composed as follows:
…
(5a)(b) Notwithstanding the any provisions of paragraphs c and d of the subdivision (5) (a)(5)
of this section to the contrary, a beneficiary who was a beneficiary retired on an early or service
retirement with the Law Enforcement Officers' Retirement System at the time of the transfer of
law enforcement officers employed by a participating employer and beneficiaries last employed
by a participating employer to this Retirement System on January 1, 1986, and who also was a
contributing member of this Retirement System on January 1, 1986, shall continue to be paid his
the retirement allowance without restriction and may continue as a member of this Retirement
System with all the rights and privileges appendant to membership. Any beneficiary who retired
on an early or service retirement allowance as an employee of any participating employer under
the Law Enforcement Officers' Retirement System and becomes employed as an employee by an
employer participating in the Retirement System after January 1, 1986, becomes subject to the
provisions of G.S. 128-24(5)c. and G.S. 128-24(5)d. on and after January 1, 1989.
(b1) Notwithstanding any provision of subdivision (a)(5) of this section to the contrary, a
beneficiary who retired on an early or service retirement as a law enforcement or justice officer
may, upon a return to service, continue to be paid the retirement allowance without restriction if
the beneficiary is eligible for distributions while in service under G.S. 128-27.1(a)(2).
(6)(c) Employees of a sending agency participating in an intergovernmental exchange of
personnel under the provisions of Article 10 of Chapter 126 shall remain members entitled to all
benefits of the System provided that the requirements of Article 10 of Chapter 126 are met;
provided further, that a met. A member may retain membership status while serving as an
assigned employee or employee on leave under the provisions of Article 10 of Chapter 126 for
purposes of receiving the death benefit regardless of whether he the member and his the employer
are contributing to his the member's account during the exchange period except that no duplicate
benefits shall be paid.
(d) In order to satisfy the Internal Revenue Service requirements that a retirement is a
bona fide separation from service and to the protect the actuarial integrity of the Retirement
System, a bona fide separation is deemed to occur when a member has severed the employment
relationship with the employer and the Board of Trustees has received all applicable termination
notifications. In order to maintain this presumption of a bona fide separation, no later than 60
days from the date a beneficiary is reemployed with an employer, the employer and the
House Bill 753-First Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
beneficiary shall file original sworn affidavits with the Board of Trustees attesting to the
following, as applicable:
(1) Prior to the beneficiary's retirement, the employer and the beneficiary did not
have an explicit understanding that the beneficiary would be subsequently
employed by the employer.
(2) The employer and the beneficiary did not reasonably anticipate that,
subsequent to the beneficiary's retirement, the beneficiary would perform for
that employer more than twenty percent (20%) of the average level of bona
fide services performed by the beneficiary for that employer during the
36-month period immediately preceding the beneficiary's retirement."

CONTINUATION OF SPECIAL SEPARATION ALLOWANCE
SECTION 2.1.(a) G.S. 143-166.41 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143-166.41. Special separation allowance.allowance for State law enforcement officers.
(a) Annual Special Separation Allowance. – Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
every sworn law-enforcement officer as defined by G.S. 135-1(11c) or G.S. 143-166.30(a)(4)
employed by a State department, agency, or institution who qualifies under this section shall
receive, receive an annual special separation allowance beginning in the month in which he
retires on a basic service retirement under the provisions of G.S. 135-5(a), an annual separation
allowance equal to eighty-five hundredths percent (0.85%) of the annual equivalent of the base
rate of compensation most recently applicable to him for each year of creditable service. The
allowance shall be paid in equal installments on the payroll frequency used by the employer. To
qualify for the allowance the officer shall:either of the following applies:
(1) Have (i) completed 30 or more years of creditable service or, (ii) have attained
55 years of age and completed five or more years of creditable service; andThe
officer retires on a basic service retirement under the provisions of
G.S. 135-5(a).
(2) Not have attained 62 years of age; andThe officer elects to begin receiving a
retirement allowance while still in service under G.S. 135-5.8(a)(1).
(3) Have completed at least five years of continuous service as a law enforcement
officer as herein defined immediately preceding a service retirement. Any
break in the continuous service required by this subsection because of
disability retirement or disability salary continuation benefits shall not
adversely affect an officer's qualification to receive the allowance, provided
the officer returns to service within 45 days after the disability benefits cease
and is otherwise qualified to receive the allowance.
…
(b) As used in this section, "creditable service" means the Definitions. – The following
definitions apply in this section:
(1) Allowance. – The annual special separation allowance for State law
enforcement officers provided for under this section.
(2) Creditable service. – The service for which credit is allowed under the
retirement system of which the officer is a member, provided that at least fifty
percent (50%) of the service is as a law enforcement officer as herein defined
or as a probation/parole officer as defined in G.S. 135-1(17a).member.
(3) Law enforcement officer. – As defined in either G.S. 135-1 or
G.S. 143-166.30(a).
(4) Officer. – A law enforcement officer.
(b1) Eligibility for Allowance. – To be eligible for an allowance under this section, an
officer is required to meet all of the following criteria:
Page 6 House Bill 753-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) The officer (i) has completed 30 or more years of creditable service or (ii) is
55 years of age or older and completed five or more years of creditable service.
(2) The officer is less than 62 years of age.
(3) The officer has completed at least five years of continuous service as a law
enforcement officer immediately preceding the officer's service retirement.
Any break in this required continuous service that is a result of disability
retirement or disability salary continuation benefits shall not adversely affect
an officer's qualification to receive an allowance under this subdivision so
long as the officer returned to service within 45 days after the disability
benefits had ceased and is otherwise qualified to receive the allowance.
(4) At least fifty percent (50%) of the officer's creditable service is as a law
enforcement officer, or for service prior to July 1, 2017, as a probation/parole
officer.
(b2) Allowance Amount. – The amount of the allowance under this section shall be
calculated as follows:
(1) For retired officers, the amount of the allowance is equal to eighty-five
hundredths percent (0.85%) of the annual equivalent of the base rate of
compensation most recently applicable to the officer for each year of
creditable service.
(2) For officers in service who have elected to receive a retirement allowance as
provided for under G.S. 135-5.8(a)(1), the amount of the allowance is equal
to eighty-five hundredths percent (0.85%) of the annual equivalent of the base
rate of compensation and years of creditable service applicable to the officer
at the time the officer makes the election to receive the allowance under
G.S. 135-5.8.
(c) Cessation of Payment. – Payment of the allowance to a retired officer under the
provisions of this section shall cease at the first of:occurrence of one of the following:
(1) The death of the officer;officer.
(2) The last day of the month in which the officer attains 62 years of age; orage.
(3) The first day of reemployment by any State department, agency, or institution,
except that this subdivision does not apply to an officer returning to State
employment in any of the following circumstances:
a. The retired officer is reemployed in a public safety position that
requires all of the following of the occupant:
1. The occupant possesses the power of arrest.
2. The occupant has taken the law enforcement oath administered
under the authority of the State as prescribed by G.S. 11-11.
3. The occupant is certified as a law enforcement officer under
the provisions of Article 1 of Chapter 17C of the General
Statutes or as deputy sheriff under the provisions of Chapter
17E of the General Statutes and exercises the authority of a law
enforcement officer or deputy sheriff.
b. The retired officer is reemployed in a position exempt from the North
Carolina Human Resources Act in an agency other than the agency
from which that officer retired.
c. The retired officer has elected to receive distributions while in service
under G.S. 135-5.8(a)(2) upon the reemployment.
(4) If an officer in service has elected to receive a retirement allowance under
G.S. 135-5.8(a)(1), the revocation of that election. If an officer later retires
after a revocation of that election and if the officer otherwise qualifies for the
allowance under this section, then the officer shall be paid the separation
House Bill 753-First Edition Page 7

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
allowance under this section as though the officer had not previously received
the allowance.
(d) Impact of Other Benefits or Actions. – This section does not affect the benefits to
which an individual may be entitled from State, federal, or private retirement systems. The
benefits payable under this section shall not be subject to any increases in salary or retirement
allowances that may be authorized by the General Assembly for employees of the State or retired
employees of the State.
(e) Eligibility Determinations. – The head of each State department, agency, or institution
shall determine the eligibility of employees for the benefits provided herein.under this section.
(f) Transfer of Funds. – The Director of the Budget may authorize from time to time the
transfer of funds within the budgets of each State department, agency, or institution necessary to
carry out the purposes of this Article. section. These funds shall be taken from those funds
appropriated to the department, agency, or institution for salaries and related fringe benefits.
(g) Responsibility for Payment. – The head of each State department, agency, or
institution shall make the payments set forth in subsection (a) this section to those persons
certified under subsection (e) of this section from funds available under subsection (f).(f) of this
section. The allowance shall be paid in equal installments on the payroll frequency used by the
employer from which the officer retired."
SECTION 2.1.(b) G.S. 143-166.42 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143-166.42. Special separation allowances for local law enforcement officers.
(a) Annual Special Separation Allowance. – On and after January 1, 1987, every sworn
law enforcement officer as defined by G.S. 128-21(11d) or G.S. 143-166.50(a)(3) employed by
a local government employer who qualifies under this section shall receive, receive an annual
special separation allowance beginning in the month in which the either of the following applies:
(1) The officer retires on a basic service retirement under the provisions of
G.S. 128-27(a), an annual separation allowance equal to eighty-five
hundredths percent (0.85%) of the annual equivalent of the base rate of
compensation most recently applicable to the officer for each year of
creditable service. The allowance shall be paid in equal installments on the
payroll frequency used by the employer. G.S. 128-27(a).
(2) The officer elects to begin receiving a retirement allowance while still in
service under G.S. 128-27.1(a)(1).
(a1) Eligibility for Allowance. – To qualify for the allowance, the officer shall:shall meet
all of the following criteria:
(1) Have The officer has (i) completed 30 or more years of creditable service or
(ii) have attained is 55 years of age or older and has completed five or more
years of creditable service; andservice.
(2) Not have attained The officer is less than 62 years of age; andage.
(3) Have The officer has completed at least five years of continuous service as a
law enforcement officer as herein defined immediately preceding a service
retirement. Any break in the this required continuous service required by this
subsection because that is a result of disability retirement or disability salary
continuation benefits shall not adversely affect an officer's qualification to
receive the allowance, provided the officer returns to service within 45 days
after the disability benefits cease and is otherwise qualified to receive the
allowance.
(4) At least fifty percent (50%) of the officer's creditable service is as a law
enforcement officer.
(b) As used in this section, "creditable service" means the service Definitions. – The
following definitions apply in this section:
Page 8 House Bill 753-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) Allowance. – The annual special separation allowance for local law
enforcement officers provided for under this section.
(2) Creditable service. – The service for which credit is allowed under the
retirement system of which the officer is a member, provided that at least fifty
percent (50%) of the service is as a law enforcement officer as herein
defined.member.
(3) Law enforcement officer. – As defined in G.S. 128-21 or G.S. 143-166.50(a).
(4) Officer. – Law enforcement officer.
(b1) Calculation of Allowance Amount. – The amount of the allowance under this section
shall be calculated as follows:
(1) For retired officers, the amount of the allowance is equal to eighty-five
hundredths percent (0.85%) of the annual equivalent of the base rate of
compensation most recently applicable to the officer for each year of
creditable service.
(2) For officers in service who have elected to receive a retirement allowance as
provided for under G.S. 128-27.1(a)(1), the amount of the allowance is equal
to eighty-five hundredths percent (0.85%) of the annual equivalent of the base
rate of compensation and years of creditable service applicable to the officer
at the time the officer makes the election to receive the allowance under
G.S. 128-27.1.
(c) Cessation of Payment. – Payment of the allowance to a retired officer under the
provisions of this section shall cease at the first of:occurrence of any of the following:
(1) The death of the officer;officer.
(2) The last day of the month in which the officer attains 62 years of age; orage.
(3) The first day of reemployment by a local government employer in any
capacity.employer, except that this subdivision does not apply to a retired
officer returning to local government employment in any of the following
circumstances:
a. The retired officer is reemployed as the sheriff of a county or in a
public safety position that requires all of the following of the occupant:
1. The occupant possesses the power of arrest.
2. The occupant has taken the law enforcement oath administered
under the authority of the State as prescribed by G.S. 11-11.
3. The occupant is certified as a law enforcement officer under
the provisions of Article 1 of Chapter 17C of the General
Statutes or as deputy sheriff under the provisions of Chapter
17E of the General Statutes and exercises the authority of a law
enforcement officer or deputy sheriff.
b. The retired officer is reemployed in service to a county board of
elections on an election day or during the hours for early voting under
Part 5 of Article 14A of Chapter 163 of the General Statutes in a
capacity that complies with G.S. 128-21(19) and does not result in
cessation or suspension of the retiree's benefit from the Local
Government Employees' Retirement System.
c. The retired officer has elected to receive distributions while in service
under G.S. 128-27.1(a)(2) upon the reemployment.
(4) If an officer in service has elected to receive a retirement allowance under
G.S. 128-27.1(a)(1), the revocation of that election. If an officer later retires
after a revocation of that election and if the officer otherwise qualifies for the
allowance under this section, then the officer shall be paid the separation
House Bill 753-First Edition Page 9

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
allowance under this section as though the officer had not previously received
the allowance.
(c1) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (3) of subsection (c) of this section,
payments to a retired officer shall not cease when a local government employer employs a retired
officer or any of the following:
(1) In a public safety position in a capacity not requiring participation in the Local
Governmental Employees' Retirement System.
(2) In service to a county board of elections on an election day or during the hours
for early voting under Part 5 of Article 14A of Chapter 163 of the General
Statutes in a capacity that complies with G.S. 128-21(19) and does not result
in cessation or suspension of the retiree's benefit from the Local Government
Employees' Retirement System.
(d) Impact of Other Benefits or Actions. – This section does not affect the benefits to
which an individual may be entitled from State, local, federal, or private retirement systems. The
benefits payable under this section shall not be subject to any increases in salary or retirement
allowances that may be authorized by local government employers or for retired employees of
local governments.
(e) Eligibility Determinations. – The governing body of each local employer shall
determine the eligibility of employees for the benefits provided herein.under this section.
(f) Responsibility for Payment. – The governing body of each local employer shall make
the payments set forth in subsection (a) of this section to those persons certified under subsection
(e) of this section from funds available. The allowance shall be paid in equal installments on the
payroll frequency used by the employer from which the officer retired."

CONTINUATION OF SHERIFFS' SUPPLEMENTAL PENSION
SECTION 3.1. G.S. 143-166.84 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143-166.84. Eligibility.
…
(a3) A county sheriff who (i) has completed at least 10 years of eligible service as a sheriff,
(ii) is at least 55 years of age or who has attained at least 30 years of creditable service regardless
of age, and (iii) has elected to receive a retirement allowance while in service under
G.S. 128-27.1(a)(1) is eligible to receive a monthly supplemental pension benefit under this
Article so long as the election to receive a retirement allowance while in service under
G.S. 128-27.1(a)(1) has not been subsequently revoked.
(b) Each eligible If a retired sheriff as defined in is eligible under subsections (a), (a1),
and (a2) of this section relating to age and service shall be entitled to receive a monthly pension
benefit under this Article beginning Article, then those monthly benefit payments shall begin
with the month immediately following the effective date of retirement.
(b2) If a sheriff who is in service is eligible under subsection (a3) of this section to receive
a monthly pension benefit under this Article, then those monthly benefit payments shall begin
with the month in which the officer elects to begin receiving the retirement allowance under
G.S. 128-27.1(a)(1).
…."
SECTION 3.2. G.S. 166-85 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143-166.85. Benefits.
(a) An eligible A retired sheriff entitled to receive a supplemental pension benefit under
this Article shall be entitled to and receive an annual pension benefit, payable in equal monthly
installments, equal to an amount that, when added to a retired retirement allowance at retirement
from the Local Governmental Employees' Retirement System or to the amount he the retired
sheriff would have been eligible to receive if service had not been forfeited by the withdrawal of
accumulated contributions, is equal to seventy-five percent (75%) of a sheriff's equivalent annual
Page 10 House Bill 753-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
salary immediately preceding retirement computed on the latest monthly base rate, to a maximum
amount that does not exceed (i) one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) or (ii) the sheriff's
equivalent annual salary immediately preceding retirement computed on the latest monthly base
rate when the benefit described in this subsection is added to the amount of the benefit the sheriff
receives under G.S. 143-166.42 and the amount of the sheriff's retired retirement allowance at
retirement from the Local Governmental Employees' Retirement System or the amount the
sheriff would have been eligible to receive if service had not been forfeited by the withdrawal of
accumulated contributions.
(a1) A sheriff who is still in service and who is entitled to receive a supplemental pension
benefit under this Article shall receive an annual pension benefit, payable in equal monthly
installments, equal to an amount that, when added to a retirement allowance from the Local
Governmental Employees' Retirement System, is equal to seventy-five percent (75%) of a
sheriff's equivalent annual salary immediately preceding the sheriff's election to begin receiving
a retirement allowance while in service under G.S. 128-27.1 computed on the latest monthly base
rate to a maximum amount that does not exceed (i) one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500)
or (ii) the sheriff's equivalent annual salary immediately preceding the sheriff's election to begin
receiving a retirement allowance while in service under G.S. 128-27.1 computed on the latest
monthly base rate when the benefit described in this subsection is added to the amount of the
benefit the sheriff receives under G.S. 143-166.42 and the amount of the sheriff's retirement
allowance from the Local Governmental Employees' Retirement System.
(b) All monthly pensions pension benefits payable under this Article shall be paid on the
last business day of each month.
(c) At the death of the pensioner, supplemental pension benefits under this Article for the
current calendar year will continue and be paid in monthly installments to the decedent's spouse
or estate, in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 28A of the General Statutes. Benefits
under this Article will cease upon the last payment being made in December of the current year.
(d) Monthly pensions pension benefits payable under this Article will cease upon the at
the first occurrence of one of the following:
(1) The full-time reemployment of a pensioner with an employer participating in
the Local Governmental Employees' Retirement System for as long as the
pensioner is so reemployed.reemployed, except under any of the following
circumstances:
a. The pensioner is reemployed full-time as the sheriff of a county or in
a public safety position meeting all of the requirements of a public
safety position under G.S. 143-166.42(c)(3).
b. The pensioner has elected to receive distributions while in service
under G.S. 128-27.1(a)(2) upon the reemployment.
(2) If a pensioner who is in service has elected to receive a retirement allowance
under G.S. 128.27.1(a)(1), the revocation of that election. If a sheriff later
retires after the revocation and if the sheriff otherwise qualifies for a
supplemental pension benefit under this Article, then the sheriff shall be paid
the monthly pension benefit as though the sheriff had not previously received
the supplemental pension benefit under this Article.
…."

PART I EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 3.3. This Part is effective October 1, 2025.

PART II. TECHNICAL AND CONFORMING CHANGES
SECTION 4.1. G.S. 135-103 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
House Bill 753-First Edition Page 11

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
"(c) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, any member of the Retirement System
that has elected to begin receiving a retirement allowance under G.S. 135-5.8 is ineligible to
participate in the Disability Income Plan while receiving a retirement allowance."
SECTION 4.2. G.S. 143-166.81(a) is repealed.
SECTION 4.3. G.S. 134-166.60(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) A Separate Insurance Benefits Plan, hereinafter called the "Plan", is to be an employee
welfare benefit plan, established for the benefit of (i) all law enforcement officers, as defined in
G.S. 135-1(11c) and G.S. 128-21(11d) G.S. 135-1 and G.S. 128-21, employed by the State and
local governments and (ii) all former law-enforcement officers previously employed by the State
and local governments, who had 20 or more years of service as an officer or are in receipt of a
disability retirement allowance from any State-administered retirement system or are in receipt
of a benefit from the Disability Income Plan of North Carolina, who shall be participants."
SECTION 4.4.(a) G.S. 143-166.30 is rewritten to read:
"§ 143-166.30. Retirement benefits for State law-enforcement officers.
(a) Definitions. – The following words and phrases as used definitions apply in this
Article, unless a different meaning is plainly required by the context, shall have the following
meanings:Article:
…
(7a) "Plan" means the Supplemental Retirement Income Plan for State Law
Enforcement Officers.
…
(d) Supplemental Retirement Income Plan for State Law-Enforcement Law Enforcement
Officers. – As of January 1, 1985, there shall be created a Supplemental Retirement Income Plan,
hereinafter called the "Plan," established for the benefit of all law-enforcement All law
enforcement officers employed by the State, who shall be participants. The Board of Trustees of
the State Retirement System shall administer the Plan and shall, under the terms and conditions
otherwise appearing herein, provide Plan benefits either (i) by establishing a separate trust fund
in conformance with Section 401(a), Section 401(k) or other sections of the Internal Revenue
Code of 1954 as amended or, (ii) by causing the Plan to affiliate with some master trust fund
providing the same benefits for participants. The Plan shall be separate and apart from any
retirement systems.State are participants in the Supplemental Retirement Income Plan as
provided by Article 5 of Chapter 135 of the General Statutes. All of the following shall apply:
(1) In addition to the contributions transferred from the Law-Enforcement
Officers' Retirement System and the contributions otherwise provided for in
this Article, participants may make voluntary contributions to the Plan to be
credited to the designated individual accounts of participants.
(2) All contributions to the Plan shall be credited to the individual accounts of
participants, and except as provided in subsection (g1) of this section, shall be
fully and immediately vested in the name of the participant, and shall be
invested according to each participant's election, as provided by the Board of
Trustees, including but not limited to time deposits, and both fixed and
variable investments. The Plan may provide for loans to participants, at
reasonable rates of interest to be charged, from participants' individual
accounts, and may provide for withdrawal of contributions on account of
hardship.
(3) The benefit to a participant in the Plan shall be either a lump-sum distribution
or a distribution in periodic installments of the participant's account payable
under retirement, disability, or termination of employment. Upon the death of
a participant there shall be paid the same lump-sum distribution or periodic
installments to the surviving spouse of the participant or otherwise to the
participant's estate; provided, should a participant instruct the Board of
Page 12 House Bill 753-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Trustees in writing that he the participant does not wish these benefits to be
paid to his the participant's spouse or estate, then the benefits shall be paid to
the person or persons as the participant may name for this purpose.
(4) Upon retirement, retirement or the election to receive a retirement allowance
under G.S. 135-5.8(a)(1),a participant in the Plan may elect to transfer any
portion of his eligible accumulated contributions, not including any Roth
after-tax contributions and the earnings thereon, contributions or earnings, to
the Teachers' and State Employees' Retirement System and receive, in
addition to his the basic service, early early, or disability retirement allowance
allowance, a special retirement allowance which shall be based on his the
participant's eligible accumulated account balance at the date of the transfer
of the assets.
(e) State Contributions to the Supplemental Retirement Income Plan. – Under all other
restrictions as are herein provided, the provided for under this section, the following State
contributions shall be made:
(1) The State shall contribute monthly to the individual accounts of participants
who are employed by the State an amount equal to five percent (5%) of the
compensation of each participant. The contributions so paid shall be in
addition to the contributions on account of court cost assessments as
hereinafter provided.
(2) Contributions shall be made to the individual accounts of all participants in
the Plan on a per capita basis in equal shares, equal to the sum of the one-half
dollar ($0.50) for each cost of court assessed and collected under G.S. 7A-304.
If a law enforcement officer elects to receive a retirement allowance under
G.S. 135-5.8(a)(1), the contributions under this subsection shall cease.
…."
SECTION 4.4.(b) G.S. 143-166.50(e) reads as rewritten:
"(e) Supplemental Retirement Income Plan for Local Governmental Law-Enforcement
Officers. – As of January 1, 1986, all All law-enforcement officers employed by a local
government employer, are participating members of the Supplemental Retirement Income Plan
as provided by Article 5 of Chapter 135 of the General Statutes. In addition to the contributions
transferred from the Law-Enforcement Officers' Retirement System, participants may make
voluntary contributions to the Supplemental Retirement Income Plan to be credited to the
designated individual accounts of participants. From July 1, 1987, until July 1, 1988, local
government employers of law enforcement officers shall contribute an amount equal to at least
two percent (2%) of participating local officers' monthly compensation to the Supplemental
Retirement Income Plan to be credited to the designated individual accounts of participating local
officers; and on and after July 1, 1988, local All of the following apply to the Supplemental
Retirement Income Plan for Local Government Officers:
(1) Local government employers of law enforcement officers shall contribute an
amount equal to five percent (5%) of participating local officers' monthly
compensation to the Supplemental Retirement Income Plan to be credited to
the designated individual accounts of participating local officers.
(2) Additional contributions shall also be made to the individual accounts of all
participants in the Plan, except for Sheriffs, on a per capita equal-share basis
from the sum of one dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) for each cost of court
collected under G.S. 7A-304.
(3) Contributions under subdivisions (1) and (2) of this subsection shall cease
upon the officer's election to receive a retirement allowance under
G.S. 128-27.1(a)(1).
House Bill 753-First Edition Page 13

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(4) Upon retirement, retirement, or the election to receive a retirement allowance
under G.S. 128-27.1(a)(1), a participant in the Plan may elect to transfer any
portion of his eligible accumulated contributions, not including any Roth
after-tax contributions and the earnings thereon, or earnings, to the Local
Governmental Employees' Retirement System and receive, in addition to his
the basic service, early early, or disability retirement allowance allowance, a
special retirement allowance which shall be that is based on his the
participant's eligible accumulated account balance at the date of the transfer
of the assets."
SECTION 4.5. This Part is effective October 1, 2025.

PART III. FUNDS TO ADDRESS INCREASED COSTS
SECTION 5.1. Effective July 1, 2025, there is appropriated from the General Fund
to the Department of State Treasurer the sum of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) in recurring
funds for each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium to be used to address the increased costs as
result of the implementation of this act.

PART IV. SEVERABILITY AND EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 6.1.(a) If any provision of this act or its application is held invalid, the
invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this act that can be given effect
without the invalid provisions or application and, to this end, the provisions of this act are
severable.
SECTION 6.1.(b) If the Internal Revenue Service (IRS) notifies the State Treasurer
that one or more provisions of this act is not in compliance with federal law or regulations, then
each provision to which the IRS notification pertains shall expire 30 days from receipt of the
notification by the State Treasurer. The State Treasurer shall notify the Revisor of Statutes of any
IRS notification that requires the expiration of a provision of this act in accordance with this
section.
SECTION 6.2.(a) All of the following expire on December 31, 2029:
(1) G.S. 135-5.8.
(2) G.S. 135-3(b1).
(3) G.S. 128-27.1.
(4) G.S. 128-24(b1).
(5) G.S. 143-166.41(a)(2), 143-166.41(b2)(2), 143-166.41(c)(3)c., and
143-166.41(c)(4).
(6) G.S. 143-166.42(a)(2), 143-166.42(b1)(2), 143-166.42(c)(3)c., and
143-166.42(c)(4).
(7) Subsections (a3) and (b2) of G.S. 143-166.84.
(8) G.S. 143-166.85(a1), 143-166.85(d)(1)b., and 143-166.85(d)(2).
(9) G.S. 135-103(c).
SECTION 6.2.(b) Any law enforcement officer who is in service and in receipt of a
retirement allowance under G.S. 135-5.8 or G.S. 128-27.1 on the date of the expiration of statutes
under subsection (a) of this section shall be allowed to continue that service and to receive the
retirement allowance. Upon separation from that service, all provisions of G.S. 135-3 and
G.S. 128-24 shall apply to any subsequent return to work.
SECTION 6.3. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
Page 14 House Bill 753-First Edition